test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-syennjir_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - syennjir: # 1B
    syennjir+N+Sg+Nom: syennjir
    syennjir+N+Sg+Gen: syennjir
    syennjir+N+Sg+Acc: syennjir
    syennjir+N+Sg+Ill: syenjirân
    syennjir+N+Sg+Loc: syenjirist
    syennjir+N+Sg+Com: syenjiráin
    syennjir+N+Sg+Abe: syennjirttáá
    syennjir+N+Ess:    syenjirin
    syennjir+N+Par:    syenjirid
    syennjir+N+Pl+Nom: syenjireh
    syennjir+N+Pl+Gen: syenjirij
    syennjir+N+Pl+Acc: syenjirijd
    syennjir+N+Pl+Ill: syenjiráid
    syennjir+N+Pl+Loc: syenjirijn
    syennjir+N+Pl+Com: syenjirijguin
    syennjir+N+Pl+Abe: syenjirijttáá
